Hawaii statutes.
§452-1 Definitions. For the purpose of
this chapter, the following definitions shall be adopted:

"Board" means the board of massage
therapy created under this chapter.

"Massage", "massage
therapy", and "Hawaiian massage" commonly known as lomilomi, means
any method of treatment of the superficial soft parts of the body, consisting
of rubbing, stroking, tapotement, pressing, shaking, or kneading with the
hands, feet, elbow, or arms, and whether or not aided by any mechanical or
electrical apparatus, appliances, or supplementary aids such as rubbing
alcohol, liniments, antiseptics, oils, powder, creams, lotions, ointments, or
other similar preparations commonly used in this practice. Any mechanical or
electrical apparatus used as described in this chapter shall be approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration.

"Massage therapist" means any person
who engages in the occupation or practice of massage for compensation.

"Massage therapist apprentice" means
any person who engages in the occupation or practice of massage under the
direct supervision of a sponsoring massage therapist who is employed by or
registered with an approved massage establishment.

"Massage therapist student" means any
person who engages in the study or practice of massage therapy who is under the
direct supervision of the teacher in a school setting.

"Massage therapy establishment" means
premises occupied and used for the purpose of practicing massage therapy or
massage therapy training; provided that when any massage therapy establishment
is situated in any building used for residential purposes, the massage therapy
establishment premises shall be set apart and shall not be used for any other
purpose. [L 1947, c 192, §1; RL 1955, §63-1; HRS §452-1; am L 1980, c 208, §3; am
L 1981, c 65, §1; am L 1987, c 190, §2; am L 1989, c 204, §1; am L 1990, c 205,
§1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next